New York, session 2025-2026, A10913.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "car rentals integrity act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 396-z of the general business law is 4 amended by adding three new paragraphs (m), (n) and (o) to read as 5 follows: 6 (m) "Mandatory fee" means any fee or surcharge that a consumer is 7 required to pay before obtaining a rental motor vehicle. 8 (n) "Extra cost" means any fee or surcharge relating to services 9 requested by the renter of the motor vehicle including, but not limited 10 to, optional equipment, child safety seats, additional driver fees, and 11 toll service charges. 12 (o) "Total price" means the complete cost of the rental vehicle and 13 shall contain any mandatory fees and extra costs. 14 § 3. Subdivision 8 of section 396-z of the general business law, as 15 amended by chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 8. No rental vehicle company shall advertise or quote a rental rate 18 that does not include all charges, except taxes [or optional items 19 and/or services or any mileage charge], which the renter must pay to 20 obtain a rental vehicle. [Provided, however, a rental vehicle company 21 shall be permitted to separately quote and charge airport fees as 22 defined herein, which shall be in addition to the rental rate; and 23 provided further that advertised rental rates that include locations at 24 which airport fees apply shall clearly indicate that additional fees 25 apply.] All rental vehicle companies shall provide renters with a list 26 of all mandatory fees and extra costs including, but not limited to, 27 airport surcharges, concession recovery fees, energy recovery EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15243-01-6 A. 10913 2 1 surcharges, young driver surcharges, additional driver fees, and daily 2 service fees. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law; provided, however that the amendments to section 5 396-z of the general business law made by sections one and two of this 6 act shall not affect the expiration and reversion of such section and 7 shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith.